Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.120

Officers must complete business.

All county officers shall complete the business of their offices, to the time of the expiration of their respective terms, and in case any officer, at the close of his or her term, leaves to his or her successor official labor to be performed, which it was his or her duty to perform, he or she shall be liable to his or her successor for the full value of such services.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4011; 1963 c 4 s 36.16.120. Prior: 1890 p 315 s 43; RRS s 4031.]